Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1539.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 44, chapter 11, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 2.1, to read: ARTICLE 2.1. domestic companion ANIMAL breeders START_STATUTE44-1617. Sale of domestic companion animals; transaction privilege tax; requirements; civil penalty; definitions A. A breeder that sells a domestic companion animal shall pay transaction privilege tax pursuant to title 42, CHAPTER 5. B. Before selling a domestic companion animal, the breeder shall do all of the following to protect the consumer or purchaser: 1. Provide the consumer or purchaser with a valid certificate of veterinary inspection that is provided by a veterinarian who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 21 for each domestic companion animal sold. 2. Maintain consistent conditions as prescribed in section 44-1799.04 that include a safe indoor and outdoor environment to ensure the health and well-being of each domestic companion animal. C. A breeder shall maintain safe breeding practices and make reasonable efforts to find humane placement or, if required, euthanasia. D. A person that violates this section is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 per violation. E. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Breeder": (a) Means any person that breeds and raises a domestic companion animal for the express purpose of selling the domestic companion animal. (b) Includes a Hobby breeder. For the purposes of this subdivision, "Hobby breeder" means any person that breeds two or more litters of domestic companion animals per year. 2. "Consumer or purchaser" means a person who purchases any domestic companion animal without an intent to resell. 3. "Domestic companion animal": (a) means any domesticated dog or cat that is bred and kept as a household pet or companion. (b) does not include livestock as defined in section 3-1201.END_STATUTE